Illinois, session 104th, SB2275.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Invest in Illinois Act is amended by 5changing Sections 30 and 32 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 751/30)7    Sec. 30. Agreement. 8    (a) Upon approval of an application under this Act, the 9Department shall enter into an agreement with the applicant 10that shall include, at a minimum, the following: 11        (1) a detailed description of the project that is the 12    subject of the agreement, as well as the performance 13    conditions, including the required amount of capital 14    investment and the number of jobs required to be created 15    or retained;16        (2) the performance conditions that must be met to 17    obtain the award, including, but not limited to, the 18    number of new jobs created, the average salary, and the 19    total capital investment;20        (3) the schedule of payments; 21        (4) a requirement that the applicant maintain 22    operations at the project location for a minimum number of 23    years;   SB2275- 2 -LRB104 03810 HLH 13834 b1        (5) a specific method for determining the number of 2    new employees and, if applicable, the number of retained 3    employees, to be employed during each taxable year covered 4    by the agreement; 5        (6) a requirement that the taxpayer annually report to 6    the Department the number of new employees and any other 7    information the Department deems necessary and appropriate 8    to perform its duties under this Act;9        (7) a detailed description of the number of new 10    employees to be hired and the occupation and payroll of 11    full-time jobs to be created or retained because of the 12    project; 13        (8) the minimum capital investment the taxpayer will 14    make, the time period for placing the property in service, 15    and the designated location in Illinois for the capital 16    investment;17        (9) a requirement that the taxpayer provide written 18    notice to the Director and the Director's designee not 19    more than 30 days after the taxpayer determines that the 20    minimum job creation, job retention, employment payroll, 21    or capital investment is no longer or will no longer be 22    achieved or maintained as required in the agreement and 23    include in that notice the number of layoffs, the date of 24    the layoffs, and the taxpayer's efforts to provide career 25    and training counseling to the impacted workers with 26    industry-related certifications and trainings;  SB2275- 3 -LRB104 03810 HLH 13834 b1        (10) a claw-back provision to recapture incentive 2    amounts for failure to meet the provisions contained in 3    the agreement; and4        (11) a provision that the agreement shall not take 5    effect, nor may any funds be expended or transferred under 6    the agreement, if the Department fails to comply with the 7    notification requirements under Section 32 or if the 8    Speaker of the House of Representatives, or the Senate 9    President, the Minority Leader of the Senate, or the 10    Minority Leader of the House of Representatives (or their 11    designees, if applicable) submit a letter of rejection 12    under Section 32.13    (b) Subject to the provisions of Section 32, the 14Department may issue the incentive to the applicant within the 15time period the Department deems appropriate in order to 16ensure that the applicant achieves the performance conditions 17set forth in the agreement.18(Source: P.A. 102-1125, eff. 2-3-23.) 19    (30 ILCS 751/32)20    Sec. 32. General Assembly notification. The Department 21shall notify the President of the Senate, or his or her 22designee, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, or 23his or her designee, the Minority Leader of the Senate, or his 24or her designee, and the Minority Leader of the House of 25Representatives, or his or her designee, when awards for the   SB2275- 4 -LRB104 03810 HLH 13834 b1purposes of this Act are nearing final negotiation with an 2applicant. The notification shall include the prospective 3amount of the award and other relevant information related to 4the application. The President of the Senate, and the Speaker 5of the House, the Minority Leader of the Senate, and the 6Minority of Leader of the House, or their designees, if 7applicable, shall certify that they have been notified of the 8planned awards and that they do not object. If there is no 9objection certified from the President of the Senate, and the 10Speaker of the House, the Minority Leader of the Senate, or the 11Minority Leader of the House, the Department may enter into an 12agreement under this Act for the award amount contained in the 13notification. If the Department enters into an agreement under 14this Act for an award in an amount that is different than the 15amount contained in the notification, it shall deliver a copy 16of the agreement to both the Speaker of the House of 17Representatives, or his or her designee, and the Senate 18President, or his or her designee, the Minority Leader of the 19Senate, or his or her designee, and the Minority Leader of the 20House of Representatives, or his or her designee, within 2 21days after the agreement is executed. Notwithstanding any 22other provision of this Act, an agreement entered into under 23this Act shall not take effect, nor may any funds be expended 24or transferred under that agreement, if the Speaker of the 25House of Representatives, and the Senate President, the 26Minority Leader of the Senate, or the Minority Leader of the   SB2275- 5 -LRB104 03810 HLH 13834 b1House of Representatives, or their designees, if applicable, 2submit a letter to the Department noting an objection to the 3agreement in writing within 2 days after the notification is 4delivered to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and 5the Senate President, the Minority Leader of the Senate, and 6the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, or their 7designees, if applicable.8(Source: P.A. 102-1125, eff. 2-3-23.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.